Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1684HV (1) 91 da/jh H.F. 2536 Section 1. Section 486A.901, Code 2025, is amended by 1 striking the section and inserting in lieu thereof the 2 following: 3 486A.901 Definitions. 4 In this article: 5 1. âConverted organizationâ means the organization into 6 which a converting domestic partnership converts pursuant to 7 this article, and continues in existence after the conversion 8 takes effect. 9 2. âConverting organizationâ means a domestic partnership 10 that converts into another organization pursuant to this 11 article and does not continue in existence after the conversion 12 takes effect. 13 3. âDomesticâ , with respect to an organization, means formed 14 and governed as to its internal affairs by a domestic governing 15 statute. 16 4. âDomestic governing statuteâ means a statute of this 17 state governing the formation and internal affairs of a 18 domestic organization, including this chapter governing a 19 partnership; chapter 488 governing a limited partnership, 20 including a limited liability limited partnership; chapter 489 21 governing a limited liability company; chapter 490 governing a 22 business corporation; chapter 504 governing a not-for-profit 23 corporation; or chapter 633A governing a business trust. 24 5. âForeignâ , with respect to an organization, means formed 25 and governed as to its internal affairs by the laws of another 26 jurisdiction. 27 6. âForeign governing statuteâ means a statute of another 28 jurisdiction governing the formation and internal affairs of 29 a foreign organization. 30 7. âGeneral partnerâ means a partner in a partnership and a 31 general partner in a limited partnership. 32 8. âGoverning statuteâ means a domestic governing statute or 33 foreign governing statute, including any predecessor statute. 34 9. âLimited partnerâ means a limited partner in a limited 35 -1- LSB 1684HV (1) 91 da/jh 1/ 10 H.F. 2536 partnership. 1 10. âLimited partnershipâ means a limited partnership formed 2 under chapter 488. 3 11. âOrganizationâ means a partnership; limited partnership, 4 including a limited liability limited partnership; limited 5 liability company; business corporation; nonprofit corporation; 6 or business trust formed if the organization is formed under a 7 domestic governing statute or foreign governing statute; or any 8 other foreign organization formed under a comparable foreign 9 governing statute. 10 12. a. âOrganizational documentâ means a public organic 11 document and other document or record that determines an 12 organizationâs internal governance and the relations among the 13 persons that own the organization, have an interest in the 14 organization, or are members of the organization, as provided 15 in its governing statute, and includes any amendment to or 16 restatement of that document or record. 17 b. âOrganizational documentâ includes but is not limited to 18 the following: 19 (1) For a domestic general partnership, its partnership 20 agreement as provided in its domestic governing statute; or 21 for a foreign general partnership, its partnership agreement 22 or a comparable document as provided in its foreign governing 23 statute. 24 (2) For a domestic limited partnership, its certificate 25 of limited partnership as provided in its domestic governing 26 statute; or for a foreign limited partnership, its certificate 27 of limited partnership or a comparable document as provided in 28 its foreign governing statute. 29 (3) For a domestic limited liability company, its 30 certificate of organization and operating agreement as provided 31 in its domestic governing statute; or for a foreign limited 32 liability company, its certificate of organization or articles 33 of organization, and operating agreement, or comparable records 34 as provided in its foreign governing statute. 35 -2- LSB 1684HV (1) 91 da/jh 2/ 10 H.F. 2536 (4) For a domestic business corporation, its articles 1 of incorporation, bylaws, and other agreements among its 2 shareholders authorized by its domestic governing statute, as 3 provided in its domestic governing statute; or for a foreign 4 business corporation, its articles of incorporation, bylaws, 5 other agreements among its shareholders authorized by its 6 foreign governing statute, or comparable documents as provided 7 in its foreign governing statute. 8 (5) For a domestic nonprofit corporation, its articles of 9 incorporation, bylaws, and other agreements among its members 10 authorized by its domestic governing statute, as provided in 11 its domestic governing statute; and for a foreign nonprofit 12 corporation, its articles of incorporation, bylaws, and 13 other agreements among its members authorized by its foreign 14 governing statute, or comparable records as provided in its 15 foreign governing statute. 16 (6) For a domestic business trust, its certificate of trust, 17 agreement of trust, or declaration of trust; and for a foreign 18 business trust, its certificate of trust, agreement of trust, 19 declaration of trust, or comparable records as provided in its 20 foreign governing statute. 21 13. âPartnerâ includes either a partner in a general 22 partnership or a general or limited partner in a limited 23 partnership. 24 14. a. âPublic organic documentâ means a document or record 25 the filing of which by the secretary of state is required 26 to form an organization and includes any amendment to or 27 restatement of that document or record. 28 b. âPublic organic documentâ includes but is not limited to 29 any of the following: 30 (1) For a domestic limited partnership, a certificate 31 of limited partnership as provided in its domestic governing 32 statute; or for a foreign limited partnership, its certificate 33 of limited partnership or a comparable document as provided in 34 its foreign governing statute. 35 -3- LSB 1684HV (1) 91 da/jh 3/ 10 H.F. 2536 (2) For a domestic limited partnership, its certificate 1 of limited partnership as provided in its domestic governing 2 statute; or for a foreign limited partnership, its certificate 3 of limited partnership or a comparable document as provided in 4 its foreign governing statute. 5 (3) For a domestic limited liability company, its 6 certificate of organization as provided in its domestic 7 governing statute; or for a foreign limited liability company, 8 its certificate of organization or articles of organization 9 or comparable records as provided in its foreign governing 10 statute. 11 (4) For a domestic business corporation, its articles 12 of incorporation as provided in its domestic governing 13 statute; or for a foreign business corporation, its articles 14 of incorporation or comparable documents as provided in its 15 foreign governing statute. 16 (5) For a domestic nonprofit corporation, its articles of 17 incorporation as provided in its domestic governing statute; 18 and for a foreign nonprofit corporation, its articles of 19 incorporation or comparable records as provided in its foreign 20 governing statute. 21 (6) For a domestic business trust, its certificate of trust, 22 agreement of trust, or declaration of trust; and for a foreign 23 business trust, its certificate of trust, agreement of trust, 24 declaration of trust, or comparable documents as provided in 25 its foreign governing statute. 26 Sec. 2. Section 486A.902, Code 2025, is amended by striking 27 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 28 486A.902 Conversion of partnership to another type of 29 organization. 30 1. A domestic partnership may be converted to another type 31 of domestic or foreign organization pursuant to this section 32 if all of the following apply: 33 a. The other organizationâs governing statute authorizes the 34 conversion. 35 -4- LSB 1684HV (1) 91 da/jh 4/ 10 H.F. 2536 b. The conversion is not prohibited by the law of the 1 jurisdiction that enacted the other organizationâs governing 2 statute. 3 c. The other organization complies with its governing 4 statute in effecting the conversion. 5 2. A plan of conversion setting forth the terms and 6 conditions of the conversion of a domestic partnership to 7 another organization must be approved by all of the partners 8 or by a number or percentage specified for conversion in the 9 partnership agreement. 10 3. A plan of conversion must be in a document and must 11 include all of the following: 12 a. The name of the converting organization. 13 b. The name, type of organization, and jurisdiction of the 14 governing statute of the converted organization. 15 c. The terms and conditions of the conversion, including 16 the manner and basis for converting interests in the converting 17 organization into any combination of money, interests in the 18 converted organization, and other consideration. 19 d. The organizational documents of the converted 20 organization. 21 e. In addition to the requirements of paragraphs âaâ through 22 âdâ , a plan of conversion may contain any other provision not 23 prohibited by law. 24 4. After the plan of conversion is approved by the partners, 25 the partnership shall deliver to the secretary of state for 26 filing articles of conversion which must include all of the 27 following: 28 a. A statement that the partnership has been converted into 29 another type of organization. 30 b. The name, type of organization of the converting 31 organization, and the jurisdiction of the governing statute of 32 the converted organization. 33 c. The name, type of organization of the converted 34 organization, and the jurisdiction of the governing statute of 35 -5- LSB 1684HV (1) 91 da/jh 5/ 10 H.F. 2536 the converted organization. 1 d. The date the conversion is effective under the governing 2 statute of the converted organization. 3 e. A statement that the conversion was approved as required 4 by this chapter. 5 f. A statement that the conversion was approved as required 6 by the governing statute of the converted organization. 7 5. The conversion takes effect when the articles of 8 conversion and any public organic document required by the 9 converted organizationâs governing statute are filed or at any 10 later date specified in the filed articles of conversion. 11 6. After a conversion pursuant to this chapter, a general 12 partner of a converting general partnership remains liable as a 13 general partner for an obligation incurred by the partnership 14 before the conversion takes effect. A person not a partner is 15 deemed to have notice of a partnershipâs participation in a 16 conversion ninety days after the articles of conversion under 17 this section become effective. 18 Sec. 3. Section 486A.904, Code 2025, is amended by striking 19 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 20 486A.904 Effect of conversion. 21 1. An organization that has been converted pursuant to this 22 article is for all purposes the same organization that existed 23 before the conversion. 24 2. When a conversion takes effect, all of the following 25 procedures apply: 26 a. All property owned by the converting organization remains 27 vested in the converted organization. 28 b. All debts, liabilities, and other obligations of 29 the converting organization continue as obligations of the 30 converted organization. 31 c. An action or proceeding pending by or against the 32 converting organization may be continued as if the conversion 33 had not occurred. 34 d. Except as prohibited by other law, all of the rights, 35 -6- LSB 1684HV (1) 91 da/jh 6/ 10 H.F. 2536 privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the converting 1 organization remain vested in the converted organization. 2 e. Except as otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, 3 the terms and conditions of the plan of conversion take effect. 4 f. Except as otherwise agreed, the conversion does not 5 dissolve a partnership for the purposes of article 8. 6 3. a. A converted foreign organization consents to the 7 jurisdiction of the courts of this state to enforce any 8 obligation owed by the converting organization, if before the 9 conversion the converting organization was subject to suit in 10 this state on the obligation. 11 b. A converted foreign organization that is not authorized 12 to transact business in this state shall appoint the secretary 13 of state as its agent for service of process for purposes of 14 enforcing an obligation under this subsection. 15 Sec. 4. Section 486A.1202, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 16 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 17 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0h. Articles of conversion . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50 18 Sec. 5. Section 488.1101, subsection 9, paragraph c, Code 19 2025, is amended to read as follows: 20 c. For a domestic or foreign limited liability company, its 21 articles certificate of organization and operating agreement, 22 or comparable records as provided in its governing statute. 23